Washington statutes.
RCW 19.108.900

Effect of chapter on other law.

(1) This chapter displaces conflicting tort, restitutionary, and other law of this state pertaining to civil liability for misappropriation of a trade secret.

(2) This chapter does not affect:

(a) Contractual or other civil liability or relief that is not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret; or

(b) Criminal liability for misappropriation of a trade secret.

[ 1981 c 286 s 7.]

NOTES:

Theft of trade secrets: RCW 9A.56.010(6), 9A.56.020.